District of Columbia statutes.
34-2601

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect and enhance the public health, welfare and safety of the citizens of the District of Columbia (“District”) and provide for the fullest possible preservation and protection of the environment. If a public utility proposes an action, it shall prepare and transmit a detailed environmental impact statement to the Public Service Commission (“Commission”). If the Commission determines than an unacceptable risk of adverse health effects exists because of an action that is proposed by a public utility, a public utility doing business in the District of Columbia shall not construct a facility or undertake a project without a detailed and comprehensive analysis and understanding of the impact that the project or the construction or operation of the facility may have on the public health, safety, and environment. These goals require that a public utility prepare and file an environmental impact statement that complies fully with the requirements of this chapter, before application is made to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs for a permit, and subchapter V of Chapter 1 of Title 8.

Oct. 19, 1989, D.C. Law 8-45, § 2, 36 DCR 5779

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1901.

Prior Codifications